test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NA_C_zhiishiib_gt-glossing.yaml
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: gzhiishiibensshibniing
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: gzhiishiibensshibniig
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+4: zhiishiibenyshibniin
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibenyshibniing
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: zhiishiibensshibniin
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibensshibniing
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+4: zhiishiibenyshibniin
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibenyshibniing
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: zhiishiibenyshibniig
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: zhiishiibensshibniin
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibensshibniing
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: zhiishiibensshibniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 6, 7
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+4: nzhiishiibenynaanbaniin
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nzhiishiibenynaanbaniing
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nzhiishiibenynaanbaniig
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+4: nzhiishiibensnaanbaniin
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nzhiishiibensnaanbaniing
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nzhiishiibensnaanbaniig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+4: gzhiishiibenynaanbaniin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gzhiishiibenynaanbaniing
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gzhiishiibenynaanbaniig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt+4: gzhiishiibenywaabniin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gzhiishiibenywaabniing
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gzhiishiibenywaabniig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+4: gzhiishiibensnaanbaniin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gzhiishiibensnaanbaniing
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gzhiishiibensnaanbaniig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+4: gzhiishiibenswaabniin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gzhiishiibenswaabniing
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gzhiishiibenswaabniig
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt+4: zhiishiibenywaabniin
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibenywaabniing
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+3+4+Prt+4: zhiishiibenyniwbaniin
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+3+4+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibenyniwbaniing
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+4: zhiishiibenswaabniin
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibenswaabniing
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+3+4+Prt+4: zhiishiibensniwbaniin
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+3+4+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibensniwbaniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nzhiishiibmishnaanba
     1+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nzhiishiibmishnaandig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gzhiishiibmishnaanba
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gzhiishiibmishnaandig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gzhiishiibmishwaaba
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gzhiishiibmishwaadig
     3+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt: zhiishiibmishniwba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: nzhiishiibmishnaanin
     1+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nzhiishiibmishnaaning
     1+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nzhiishiibmishnaanig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gzhiishiibmishnaanin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gzhiishiibmishnaaning
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gzhiishiibmishnaanig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: gzhiishiibmishwaan
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gzhiishiibmishwaang
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gzhiishiibmishwaag
     3+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: zhiishiibmishwaan
     3+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: zhiishiibmishwaang
     3+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+4: zhiishiibmishniwan
     3+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Loc: zhiishiibmishniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: nzhiishiibmishbaniin
     1+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: nzhiishiibmishbaniing
     1+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: nzhiishiibmishbaniig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: gzhiishiibmishbaniin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gzhiishiibmishbaniing
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gzhiishiibmishbaniig
     3+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: zhiishiibmishbaniin
     3+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibmishbaniing
     X+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: zhiishiibmishbaniin
     X+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibmishbaniing
     X+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: zhiishiibmishbaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: nzhiishiibminaanbaniin
     1+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nzhiishiibminaanbaniing
     1+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nzhiishiibminaanbaniig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: gzhiishiibminaanbaniin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gzhiishiibminaanbaniing
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gzhiishiibminaanbaniig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: gzhiishiibmiwaabniin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gzhiishiibmiwaabniing
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gzhiishiibmiwaabniig
     3+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: zhiishiibmiwaabniin
     3+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibmiwaabniing
     3+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+4: zhiishiibminwibniin
     3+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibminwibniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nzhiishiibshinaanbaniin
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nzhiishiibshinaanbaniing
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nzhiishiibshinaanbaniig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gzhiishiibshinaanbaniin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gzhiishiibshinaanbaniing
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gzhiishiibshinaanbaniig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gzhiishiibshiwaabniin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gzhiishiibshiwaabniing
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gzhiishiibshiwaabniig
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: zhiishiibshiwaabniin
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibshiwaabniing
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: zhiishiibshinwibniin
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibshinwibniing
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nzhiishiibenymishnaanba
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nzhiishiibenymishnaandig
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nzhiishiibensmishnaanba
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nzhiishiibensmishnaandig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gzhiishiibenymishnaanba
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gzhiishiibenymishnaandig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gzhiishiibenymishwaaba
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gzhiishiibenymishwaadig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gzhiishiibensmishnaanba
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gzhiishiibensmishnaandig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gzhiishiibensmishwaaba
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gzhiishiibensmishwaadig
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt: zhiishiibenymishniwba
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt: zhiishiibensmishniwba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: nzhiishiibenymishnaanin
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nzhiishiibenymishnaaning
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nzhiishiibenymishnaanig
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: nzhiishiibensmishnaanin
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nzhiishiibensmishnaaning
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nzhiishiibensmishnaanig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gzhiishiibenymishnaanin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gzhiishiibenymishnaaning
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gzhiishiibenymishnaanig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: gzhiishiibenymishwaan
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gzhiishiibenymishwaang
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gzhiishiibenymishwaag
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gzhiishiibensmishnaanin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gzhiishiibensmishnaaning
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gzhiishiibensmishnaanig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: gzhiishiibensmishwaan
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gzhiishiibensmishwaang
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gzhiishiibensmishwaag
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: zhiishiibenymishwaan
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: zhiishiibenymishwaang
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+4: zhiishiibenymishniwan
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Loc: zhiishiibenymishniing
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: zhiishiibensmishwaan
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: zhiishiibensmishwaang
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+4: zhiishiibensmishniwan
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Loc: zhiishiibensmishniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: nzhiishiibenymishbaniin
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: nzhiishiibenymishbaniing
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: nzhiishiibenymishbaniig
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: nzhiishiibensmishbaniin
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: nzhiishiibensmishbaniing
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: nzhiishiibensmishbaniig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: gzhiishiibenymishbaniin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gzhiishiibenymishbaniing
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gzhiishiibenymishbaniig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: gzhiishiibensmishbaniin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gzhiishiibensmishbaniing
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gzhiishiibensmishbaniig
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: zhiishiibenymishbaniin
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibenymishbaniing
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: zhiishiibensmishbaniin
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibensmishbaniing
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: zhiishiibenymishbaniin
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibenymishbaniing
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: zhiishiibenymishbaniig
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: zhiishiibensmishbaniin
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibensmishbaniing
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: zhiishiibensmishbaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: nzhiishiibenyminaanbaniin
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nzhiishiibenyminaanbaniing
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nzhiishiibenyminaanbaniig
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: nzhiishiibensminaanbaniin
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nzhiishiibensminaanbaniing
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nzhiishiibensminaanbaniig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: gzhiishiibenyminaanbaniin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gzhiishiibenyminaanbaniing
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gzhiishiibenyminaanbaniig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: gzhiishiibenymiwaabniin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gzhiishiibenymiwaabniing
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gzhiishiibenymiwaabniig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: gzhiishiibensminaanbaniin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gzhiishiibensminaanbaniing
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gzhiishiibensminaanbaniig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: gzhiishiibensmiwaabniin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gzhiishiibensmiwaabniing
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gzhiishiibensmiwaabniig
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: zhiishiibenymiwaabniin
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibenymiwaabniing
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+4: zhiishiibenyminwibniin
